Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.020

County noxious weed control boards—Created—Jurisdiction—Inactive status.

(1) In each county of the state there is created a noxious weed control board, bearing the name of the county within which it is located. The jurisdictional boundaries of each board are the boundaries of the county within which it is located.

(2) Each noxious weed control board is inactive until activated pursuant to the provisions of RCW 17.10.040.

[ 1997 c 353 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 2.]